en: Kit items included: Acid blend; Airlock; Back-sweetening pack; Bottling wand; Campden tablets (sulfite); Corker; Corks; Fermentation vessel; Fining agents/clarifiers; Hydrometer; Ingredients only; Labels; Oak chips/oak cubes; Sanitizer; Siphon (auto-siphon); Stabilizer (potassium sorbate); Thermometer; Wine bottles; Yeast; Other
vi: Các vật dụng đi kèm trong bộ: Hỗn hợp axit; Airlock; Gói làm ngọt sau lên men; Ống rót chai; Viên Campden (sulfite); Máy đóng nút bần; Nút bần; Bình lên men; Chất tinh lọc/chất làm trong; Tỷ trọng kế; Chỉ nguyên liệu; Nhãn; Dăm sồi/khối gỗ sồi; Chất khử trùng; Siphon (siphon tự động); Chất ổn định (kali sorbat); Nhiệt kế; Chai rượu vang; Men; Khác
hr-HR: Uključene stavke kompleta: Mješavina kiselina; Vrenjača; Pakiranje za naknadno zaslađivanje; Štap za punjenje boca; Campden tablete (sulfit); Čepilica; Čepovi; Posuda za vrenje; Sredstva za bistrenje; Hidrometar; Samo sastojci; Naljepnice; Hrastov čips / hrastove kocke; Sredstvo za dezinfekciju; Sifon (automatski sifon); Stabilizator (kalijev sorbat); Termometar; Boce za vino; Kvasac; Ostalo
pl: Dołączono elementy zestawu: Mieszanka kwasowa; Rurka fermentacyjna; Pakiet do dosładzania; Zaworek grawitacyjny do butelkowania; Tabletki Campdena (siarczyny); Korkownica; Korki; Naczynie fermentacyjne; Środki klarujące; Areometr; Tylko składniki; Etykiety; Płatki dębowe / kostki dębowe; Środek odkażający; Syfon (automatyczny); Stabilizator (sorbinian potasu); Termometr; Butelki do wina; Drożdże; Inne
pt-BR: Itens do kit inclusos: Mistura de ácidos; Airlock; Pacote de adoçante pós-fermentação; Tubo de engarrafamento; Pastilhas Campden (sulfito); Arrolhador; Rolhas; Recipiente de fermentação; Agentes de colagem/clarificantes; Densímetro; Apenas ingredientes; Rótulos; Lascas de carvalho/cubos de carvalho; Sanitizante; Sifão (autossifão); Estabilizante (sorbato de potássio); Termômetro; Garrafas de vinho; Levedura; Outros
fr: Éléments inclus dans le kit: Mélange d’acides; Barboteur; Pack d’édulcoration; Tige d’embouteillage; Comprimés Campden (sulfites); Boucheuse; Bouchons; Cuve de fermentation; Agents de collage/clarifiants; Densimètre; Ingrédients uniquement; Étiquettes; Copeaux/cubes de chêne; Désinfectant; Siphon (auto-siphon); Stabilisateur (sorbate de potassium); Thermomètre; Bouteilles de vin; Levure; Autre
nl: Kit meegeleverde items: Zuurmengsel; Waterslot; Aanzoetpakket; Bottelstaaf; Campden-tabletten (sulfiet); Kurkenapparaat; Kurken; Gistingsvat; Klaringsmiddelen; Hydrometer; Alleen ingrediënten; Labels; Eikenhouten snippers/blokjes; Ontsmettingsmiddel; Hevel (auto-hevel); Stabilisator (kaliumsorbaat); Thermometer; Wijnflessen; Gist; Anders
zh-CN: 套装内含物品: 混合酸; 发酵栓; 增甜包; 装瓶棒; 坎普登片（亚硫酸盐）; 打塞机; 软木塞; 发酵容器; 澄清剂; 液体比重计; 仅原料; 标签; 橡木屑/橡木块; 消毒剂; 虹吸管（自动虹吸管）; 稳定剂（山梨酸钾）; 温度计; 葡萄酒瓶; 酵母; 其他
sv: Delar som ingår i setet: Syrablandning; Jäsrör; Eftersötningspaket; Flaskfyllare; Campden-tabletter (sulfit); Korkapparat; Korkar; Jäskärl; Klarningsmedel; Hydrometer; Endast ingredienser; Etiketter; Ekspån/ekbitar; Desinfektionsmedel; Hävert (autohävert); Stabiliseringsmedel (kaliumsorbat); Termometer; Vinflaskor; Jäst; Övrigt
ja: キットアイテム付き: アシッドブレンド; エアロック; バックスウィートニングパック; ボトリングワンド; キャンプデンタブレット (亜硫酸塩); 打栓機; コルク; 発酵容器; 清澄剤; 比重計; 材料のみ; ラベル; オークチップ/オークキューブ; 殺菌剤; サイフォン (オートサイフォン); 安定剤 (ソルビン酸カリウム); 温度計; ワインボトル; 酵母; その他
lt-LT: Į rinkinį įeinantys elementai: Rūgščių mišinys; Alsuoklis; Papildomo saldinimo pakuotė; Išpilstymo vamzdelis; Campdeno tabletės (sulfitai); Kamščiavimo įrankis; Kamščiai; Fermentacijos indas; Skaidrinimo medžiagos; Hidrometras; Tik ingredientai; Etiketės; Ąžuolo drožlės / ąžuolo kubeliai; Dezinfekavimo priemonė; Sifonas (automatinis sifonas); Stabilizatorius (kalio sorbatas); Termometras; Vyno buteliai; Mielės; Kita
sk-SK: Vrátane položiek súpravy: Zmes kyselín; Kvasná zátka; Balenie na dosladenie; Stáčacia trubica; Tablety Campden (siričitany); Zátkovačka; Korky; Kvasná nádoba; Číridlá/číriace látky; Hustomer; Iba prísady; Štítky; Dubové lupienky/dubové kocky; Dezinfekčný prostriedok; Sifón (autosifón); Stabilizátor (sorban draselný); Teplomer; Fľaše na víno; Kvasnice; Iné
nb: Inkluderte deler i sett: Syreblanding; Gjærlås; Ettersøtningspakke; Tappestav; Campden-tabletter (sulfitt); Korkemaskin; Korker; Gjæringskar; Klaringsmidler; Hydrometer; Kun ingredienser; Etiketter; Eikespon/eiketerninger; Desinfeksjonsmiddel; Hevert (autohevert); Stabilisator (kaliumsorbat); Termometer; Vinflasker; Gjær; Annet
hu: A készlet tartozék elemei: Savkeverék; Kotyogó; Utóédesítő csomag; Palackozó pálca; Campden-tabletta (szulfit); Dugózó; Parafa dugók; Erjesztőedény; Derítőanyagok / tisztítók; Fokoló / hidrométer; Csak összetevők; Címkék; Tölgyfaforgács / tölgyfakocka; Fertőtlenítőszer; Lopó (automata lopó); Stabilizátor (kálium-szorbát); Hőmérő; Borosüvegek; Élesztő; Egyéb
tr: Dahil olan kit öğeleri: Asit karışımı; Hava kilidi; Tatlandırma paketi; Şişeleme çubuğu; Campden tabletleri (sülfit); Mantar kapama aleti; Mantarlar; Fermantasyon kabı; Berraklaştırıcı ajanlar/arıtıcılar; Hidrometre; Yalnızca malzemeler; Etiketler; Meşe yongası/meşe küpü; Dezenfektan; Sifon (otomatik sifon); Stabilizatör (potasyum sorbat); Termometre; Şarap şişeleri; Maya; Diğer
da: Inkluderede sætgenstande: Syreblanding; Gærlås; Efter-sødningspakke; Tappestav; Campden-tabletter (sulfit); Propmaskine; Propper; Gæringsbeholder; Klaringsmidler; Hydrometer; Kun ingredienser; Labels; Egespåner/egetræstern; Desinfektionsmiddel; Hævert (auto-hævert); Stabilisator (kaliumsorbat); Termometer; Vinflasker; Gær; Andet
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no kit: Mistura de ácidos; Válvula de fermentação; Pacote de adoçamento posterior; Tubo de engarrafamento; Pastilhas Campden (sulfito); Rolhador; Rolhas; Recipiente de fermentação; Agentes de colagem/clarificadores; Hidrómetro; Apenas ingredientes; Etiquetas; Lascas de carvalho/cubos de carvalho; Desinfetante; Sifão (autossifão); Estabilizador (sorbato de potássio); Termómetro; Garrafas de vinho; Levedura; Outro
ko: 키트 항목 포함: 산 혼합물; 에어록; 백스위트닝 팩; 병입 봉; 캠프덴 정제(아황산염); 코르크 마개 기계; 코르크; 발효 용기; 청징제; 비중계; 재료만; 레이블; 오크 칩/오크 큐브; 살균제; 사이펀(오토 사이펀); 안정제(소르빈산칼륨); 온도계; 와인 병; 효모; 기타
sl-SI: Vključeni kosi v kompletu: Mešanica kislin; Vrelna veha; Paket za dosladkanje; Polnilna cevka; Campden tablete (sulfit); Mašilec za steklenice; Zamaški; Fermentacijska posoda; Sredstva za bistrenje; Hidrometer; Samo sestavine; Etikete; Hrastov čips/hrastove kocke; Razkužilo; Sifon (avtomatski sifon); Stabilizator (kalijev sorbat); Termometer; Vinske steklenice; Kvas; Drugo
es: Artículos incluidos en el kit: Mezcla de ácidos; Esclusa de aire; Paquete de endulzado posterior; Tubo de embotellado; Tabletas Campden (sulfito); Encorchadora; Corchos; Recipiente de fermentación; Agentes clarificantes/clarificadores; Hidrómetro; Solo ingredientes; Etiquetas; Astillas de roble/cubos de roble; Desinfectante; Sifón (autosifón); Estabilizador (sorbato de potasio); Termómetro; Botellas de vino; Levadura; Otros
zh-TW: 套件隨附品項: 混合酸; 單向排氣閥; 增甜包; 裝瓶棒; 坎普登片 (亞硫酸鹽); 軟木塞打塞機; 軟木塞; 發酵容器; 澄清劑; 比重計; 僅備料; 標籤; 橡木片/橡木塊; 消毒劑; 虹吸管 (自動虹吸管); 穩定劑 (山梨酸鉀); 溫度計; 酒瓶; 酵母; 其他
de: Enthaltene Paket-Artikel: Säuremischung; Gärspund; Nachsüßungspackung; Abfüllröhrchen; Campden-Tabletten (Sulfit); Verkorker; Korken; Gärbehälter; Schönungsmittel/Klärmittel; Hydrometer; Nur Zutaten; Etiketten; Eichenchips/Eichenwürfel; Desinfektionsmittel; Siphon (Auto-Siphon); Stabilisator (Kaliumsorbat); Thermometer; Weinflaschen; Hefe; Sonstige
fi: Sarjaan sisältyvät osat: Happoseos; Vesilukko; Jälkimakeutuspakkaus; Pullotustikku; Campden-tabletit (sulfiitti); Korkittaja; Korkit; Käymisastia; Kirkastusaineet; Hydrometri; Vain ainesosat; Etiketit; Tammilastut/tammikuutiot; Desinfiointiaine; Lappo (automaattilappo); Stabilointiaine (kaliumsorbaatti); Lämpömittari; Viinipullot; Hiiva; Muu
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα είδη κιτ: Μείγμα οξέων; Αεροφράκτης; Πακέτο επαναγλύκανσης; Ράβδος εμφιάλωσης; Ταμπλέτες Campden (θειώδη); Ταρταδόρος; Φελλοί; Δοχείο ζύμωσης; Διαυγαστικά/παράγοντες καθαρισμού; Πυκνόμετρο; Μόνο συστατικά; Ετικέτες; Ροκανίδια δρυός/Κύβοι δρυός; Απολυμαντικό; Σιφόνι (αυτόματο σιφόνι); Σταθεροποιητής (σορβικό κάλιο); Θερμόμετρο; Μπουκάλια κρασιού; Μαγιά; Άλλο
th: รายการอุปกรณ์ที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: สารผสมกรด; แอร์ล็อก; ชุดเติมความหวาน; ก้านบรรจุขวด; ยาเม็ดแคมป์เดน (ซัลไฟต์); เครื่องปิดจุกก๊อก; จุกก๊อก; ภาชนะหมัก; สารทำใส; ไฮโดรมิเตอร์; ส่วนผสมเท่านั้น; ฉลาก; ชิปไม้โอ๊ก/ลูกบาศก์ไม้โอ๊ก; น้ำยาฆ่าเชื้อ; สายยางกาลักน้ำ (แบบอัตโนมัติ); สารรักษาสภาพ (โพแทสเซียมซอร์เบต); เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; ขวดไวน์; ยีสต์; อื่นๆ
it: Articoli del Kit inclusi: Miscela acida; Gorgogliatore; Pacchetto per la dolcificazione successiva; Asta da imbottigliamento; Pasticche Campden (solfito); Tappatrice; Tappi di sughero; Recipiente di fermentazione; Agenti affinanti/chiarificanti; Densimetro; Solo ingredienti; Etichette; Trucioli di rovere/cubetti di rovere; Igienizzante; Sifone (sifone automatico); Stabilizzante (sorbato di potassio); Termometro; Bottiglie di vino; Lievito; Altro
ro-RO: Articole incluse în kit: Amestec de acizi; Supapă de fermentație; Pachet pentru re-îndulcire; Tijă de îmbuteliere; Tablete Campden (sulfit); Dispozitiv de dopuire; Dopuri; Vas de fermentație; Agenți de limpezire/clarificatori; Hidrometru; Doar ingrediente; Etichete; Așchii de stejar/cuburi de stejar; Dezinfectant; Sifon (autosifon); Stabilizator (sorbat de potasiu); Termometru; Sticle de vin; Drojdie; Altele
ru: Элементы в комплекте: Смесь кислот; Гидрозатвор; Пакет для дослащивания; Трубка для розлива; Таблетки Campden (сульфит); Укупориватель; Пробки; Бродильная емкость; Осветлители; Ареометр; Только ингредиенты; Этикетки; Дубовая щепа/дубовые кубики; Дезинфицирующее средство; Сифон (автосифон); Стабилизатор (сорбат калия); Термометр; Винные бутылки; Дрожжи; Другое
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплекта: Киселинна смес; Въздушен клапан; Пакет за дослаждане; Тръбичка за бутилиране; Кампденови таблетки (сулфит); Затапвачка; Коркови тапи; Съд за ферментация; Избистрящи агенти/бистрители; Хидрометър; Само съставки; Етикети; Дъбов чипс/дъбови кубчета; Дезинфектант; Сифон (автоматичен сифон); Стабилизатор (калиев сорбат); Термометър; Бутилки за вино; Дрожди; Друго
cs: Součásti sady: Směs kyselin; Kvasná zátka; Balení pro doslazení; Stáčecí trubička; Tablety Campden (siřičitan); Zátkovačka; Korkové zátky; Kvasná nádoba; Čiřicí prostředky; Hustoměr; Pouze suroviny; Štítky; Dubové lupínky / dubové kostky; Dezinfekční prostředek; Sifon (autosifon); Stabilizátor (sorban draselný); Teploměr; Láhve na víno; Kvasnice; Jiné